New Jersey, session 222, S1006.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    United States military personnel and their dependents who are living in New Jersey and are attending a county college established by the county in which they reside or are stationed shall be regarded as residents of the county for the purpose of determining tuition. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the academic year beginning after the effective date of this act.